District of Columbia statutes.
5-121.05

Compromise of felony; withholding information; receiving compensation from person arrested or liable to arrest; permitting escape.

It is unlawful for any private detective, or any member of the police force, or for any other person to compromise a felony or any other unlawful act, or to participate in, assent to, aid or assist any person suspected of crime to escape a full judicial examination by failing to give known facts or reasonable causes of suspicion, or withholding any information relative to the charge or suspicion from the proper judicial authorities; or in any manner to receive any money, property, favor, or other compensation from, or on account of, any person arrested or subject to arrest for any crime or supposed crime; or to permit any such person to go at large without due effort to secure an investigation of such supposed crime. And for any violation of the provisions of this section, or either of them, such member of the police force, or private detective, or other person guilty thereof, shall be deemed as having compromised a felony, and shall be thereafter prohibited from acting as an officer of said police force, or as a private detective, and shall be prosecuted to the extent of the law for aiding criminals to escape the ends of justice.

History

R.S., D.C., § 431

Cross References

Rewards for apprehension of fugitives, prohibition of policeman from receiving, see § 24-201.27.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-175.
1973 Ed., § 4-175.